New York, session 2025-2026, A5449.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14 of chapter 560 of the laws of 1998, amending the 2 not-for-profit corporation law and other laws, relating to combinations 3 of cemetery corporations and funeral entities, and the sale of monuments 4 and memorials, is amended by adding a new subdivision 2 to read as 5 follows: 6 2. For the purposes of this section and provided that the funeral 7 entity complies with paragraph (b) of section 1503 of the not-for-profit 8 corporation law, where applicable, and all other applicable laws and 9 regulations, the Finger Lakes Crematory, located on the premises of 10 Kevin Dougherty Funeral Home at 21 Big Tree Street in the village of 11 Livonia, Livingston county may add an additional retort expressly and 12 solely for use in an instance of mechanical or technical failure of an 13 existing retort. Any such addition of a retort expressly and solely for 14 use in an instance of mechanical or technical failure of an existing 15 retort shall not diminish or otherwise affect the ability of such crema- 16 tory to be operated as provided in this section. Nothing in this act 17 shall entitle such crematory to expand its operations or otherwise 18 permit noncompliance with the provisions of this act. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07386-02-5